Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1508.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. The Secretary of State shall study elections. The Secretary of State shall
submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations
for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to elections
no later than September 15, 2027.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 103